North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-40.2 Use Tax

57-40.2-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context and subject matter otherwise require:

“Business”, “certified automated system”, “certified service provider”, “commissioner”, “computer software contract”, “farm machinery”, “gross receipts”, “lease or rental”, “local governmental unit”, “mandatory computer software maintenance contract”, “optional computer software maintenance contract”, “person”, “relief agency”, “retail sale”, “sale”, and “tangible personal property”, each has the meaning given to it in section 57-39.2-01.

Property used in “processing”, as that term is used in subsection 9, means any tangible personal property including containers which it is intended, by means of fabrication, compounding, manufacturing, producing, or germination, shall become an integral or an ingredient or component part of other tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retail. The purchase of an item of tangible personal property for the purpose of incorporating it in or attaching it to real property must be considered as a purchase of tangible personal property for a purpose other than for processing.

“Purchase” means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration. “Purchase” also means the severing of sand or gravel from the soil of this state.

“Purchase price” applies to the measure subject to use tax and has the same meaning as gross receipts as defined in section 57-39.2-01.

“Purchased at retail” includes:

The completion of the fabricating, compounding, or manufacturing of tangible personal property by a person for storage, use, or consumption by that person.

The furnishing of wares, merchandise, and gas, when furnished or delivered to consumers or users within this state, and the sale of vulcanizing, recapping, and retreading services for tires.

The leasing or renting of tangible personal property, the sale, storage, use, or consumption of which has not been previously subjected to a retail sales or use tax in this state.

The purchase of magazines or other periodicals. Provided, the words “magazines and other periodicals” as used in this subdivision do not include newspapers nor magazines or periodicals that are furnished free by a nonprofit corporation or organization to its members or because of payment by its members of membership fees or dues.

The severance of sand or gravel from the soil.

The purchase, including the leasing or renting, of tangible personal property from any bank for storage, use, or consumption.

The purchase of an item of tangible personal property by a purchaser who rents or leases it to a person under a finance leasing agreement over the term of which the property will be substantially consumed, if the purchaser elects to treat it as being purchased at retail by paying or causing the transferor to pay the use tax to the commissioner on or before the last day on which payments may be made without penalty as provided in section 57-40.2-07.

“Retailer” includes every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property for use within the meaning of this chapter, but, when in the opinion of the commissioner, it is necessary for the efficient administration of this chapter to regard any salesman, representative, trucker, peddler, or canvasser as the agent of the dealer, distributor, supervisor, employer, or other person under whom that person operates or from whom that person obtains the tangible personal property sold by that person, whether that person is making sales in that person’s own behalf or in behalf of such dealer, distributor, supervisor, employer, or other person, the commissioner may regard that person as such agent, and may regard the dealer, distributor, supervisor, employer, or other person as a retailer for the purposes of this chapter.

“Retailer maintaining a place of business in this state”, or any like term, means any retailer having or maintaining within this state, directly or by a subsidiary, an office, distribution house, sales house, warehouse, or other place of business, or any agent operating within this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary, whether such place of business or agent is located in the state permanently or temporarily, or whether or not such retailer or subsidiary is authorized to do business within this state.

“Use” means the exercise by any person of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership or possession of that property, including the storage, use, or consumption of that property in this state, except that it does not include processing, or the sale of that property in the regular course of business. “Use” also means the severing of sand or gravel from the soil of this state for use within or outside this state.

“Use tax” means the tax levied under section 57-40.2-02.1 or imposed under home rule authority by a city or county.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 26; 1969, ch. 472, § 4; 1969, ch. 519, § 2; 1977, ch. 544, § 3; 1981, ch. 598, § 6; 1981, ch. 599, § 3; 1987, ch. 687, § 5, R.M. disapproved June 14, 1988; 1987, ch. 703, § 2; 1987, ch. 704, § 2; 1987, ch. 715, § 1; 1989, ch. 713, § 3; 1995, ch. 570, § 2; 1999, ch. 518, § 2; 2001, ch. 535, § 5; 2003, ch. 539, §§ 21, 22; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 569, § 3; 2005, ch. 580, § 14; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 446, § 5; 2009, ch. 556, § 20; 2019, ch. 496, § 3, eff for taxable events occurring after July 1, 2019.

57-40.2-02.
Tax imposed. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-40.2-02.1.
Use tax imposed.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, an excise tax is imposed on the storage, use, or consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased at retail for storage, use, or consumption in this state, at the rate of five percent of the purchase price of the property. Except as provided in section 57-40.2-11, an excise tax is imposed on the storage, use, or consumption in this state of tangible personal property not originally purchased for storage, use, or consumption in this state at the rate of five percent of the fair market value of the property at the time it was brought into this state.

For purposes of manufactured homes, as defined in section 41-09-02, an excise tax is imposed on the storage, use, or consumption in this state of manufactured homes used for residential or business purposes, except as provided in subsection 18 of section 57-40.2-04 purchased at retail for storage, use, or consumption in this state at the rate of three percent of the purchase price thereof. Except as provided in section 57-40.2-11, and except as provided in subsection 35 of section 57-39.2-04, an excise tax is imposed on the storage, use, or consumption in this state of a manufactured home used for residential or business purposes at the rate of three percent of the fair market value of a manufactured home used for residential or business purposes at the time it was brought into this state. A manufactured home removed from North Dakota for installation in another state is not stored, used, or consumed in this state. Installation of a manufactured home includes any method established under section 54-21.3-08.

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 529, § 7.

An excise tax is imposed on the fair market value of sand or gravel severed when sand or gravel is not sold at retail as tangible personal property by the person severing the sand or gravel. If the sand or gravel is not sold at retail by the person severing the sand or gravel, it must be presumed until the contrary is shown by the commissioner or by the person severing the sand or gravel that the fair market value is eight cents per ton of two thousand pounds [907.18 kilograms]. If records are not kept as to the tonnage of sand or gravel severed from the soil, it must be presumed for the purpose of this chapter that one cubic yard [764.55 liters] of sand or gravel is equal to one and one-half tons [1360.78 kilograms] of sand or gravel.

Source:

I.M. approved November 2, 1976; S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 3; 1981, ch. 601, § 4; 1983, ch. 645, § 3; 1987, ch. 705, § 4; 1989, ch. 714, § 5, R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1989, ch. 716, § 3; 1993, ch. 45, § 20; 1997, ch. 496, § 4; 1997, ch. 497, § 2; 1999, ch. 516, § 2; 1999, ch. 517, § 2; 1999, ch. 518, § 3; 2001, ch. 534, § 4; 2001, ch. 535, § 6; 2003, ch. 539, § 23; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 15; 2005, ch. 582, § 2 2007, ch. 529, § 5, 7; 2013, ch. 458, § 4.

Cross-References.

In lieu of sales tax fees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-39.3.

Collateral References.

Use tax as within tax exemption provision of statutes other than those imposing such taxes, 1 A.L.R.2d 465.

Use tax on property purchased by nonresident in another state, 41 A.L.R.2d 535.

Federal retail luxury or other excise taxes as includable in amount on which state use tax is computed, 43 A.L.R.2d 862.

Sales and use taxes on leased tangible personal property, 2 A.L.R.4th 859.

State or local sales, use, or privilege tax on sales of, or revenues from sales of, advertising space or services, 40 A.L.R.4th 1114.

Sales and use taxes on sale or lease of mailing or customer list, 80 A.L.R.4th 1126.

Law Reviews.

Virtual Reality: Quill’s “Physical Presence” Requirement Obsolete When Cogitating Use Tax Collection in Cyberspace, 74 N.D. L. Rev. 3 (1998).

57-40.2-02.3.
Certain sellers located outside this state required to collect and remit sales taxes — Criteria.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any seller of tangible personal property or other taxable product for delivery in this state, which does not have a physical presence in this state, is subject to this chapter and chapter 57-39.2 and shall remit sales or use tax if the seller’s gross sales from the sale of tangible personal property and other taxable items delivered in this state exceed one hundred thousand dollars in the previous calendar year, or the current calendar year. A seller that exceeds this sales threshold shall obtain a permit under section 57-39.2-14, and begin collecting the tax on sales delivered during the following calendar year or beginning sixty days after the threshold is met, whichever is earlier. The seller shall follow all applicable procedures and requirements of law as if the seller had a physical presence in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 408, § 2, effective June 21, 2018; § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 408, S.L. 2017 provides, “

CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

This Act becomes effective on the date the United States Supreme Court issues an opinion overturning
Quill v. North Dakota, 504 U.S. 298 (1992), or otherwise confirming a state may constitutionally impose its sales or use tax upon an out-of-state seller in circumstances similar to those specified in
section 57-30.2-02.2.” [Contingency met in 2018]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.
See contingency note.

57-40.2-02.4.
Marketplace facilitator tax collection requirement.

For the purposes of this section:

“Exemption certificate” means documentation furnished by a buyer to a seller to claim an exemption from sales or use tax. The term includes a resale certificate or other documentation authorized in section 57-40.2-04 furnished by a buyer to a seller.

“Marketplace” means a physical or electronic place where one or more marketplace sellers sell or offer for sale tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-40.2-02.1, regardless of whether the marketplace seller has a physical presence in this state. A physical or electronic place includes a store, booth, internet website, catalog, television, radio broadcast, or a dedicated sales software application.

“Marketplace facilitator” means a person that:

Contracts with sellers to facilitate for consideration, regardless of whether deducted as fees from the transaction, the sale of the seller’s products through a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person;

Engages directly or indirectly, through one or more affiliated persons, in any of the following:

Transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller;

Owning or operating the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or technology that brings buyers and sellers together;

Providing a virtual currency that buyers are allowed or required to use to purchase products from the seller; or

Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in subparagraph a, if such activities are directly related to a physical presence or electronic marketplace operated by the person or an affiliated person; and

Engages in any of the following activities with respect to the seller’s products:

Payment processing services;

Fulfillment or storage services;

Listing products for sale;

Setting prices;

Branding sales as those of the marketplace facilitator;

Order taking;

Advertising or promotion; or

Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.

The term does not include a payment processor business appointed by a merchant to handle payment transactions from various channels, such as credit cards and debit cards, and whose sole activity with respect to marketplace sales is to handle transactions between two parties.

“Marketplace seller” means a retailer that sells or offers for sale tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-40.2-02.1, through a marketplace that is owned, operated, or controlled by a marketplace facilitator.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any marketplace facilitator facilitating sales of tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-39.2-02.1, which does not have a physical presence in this state, is a retailer subject to chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2 and shall remit sales or use tax if the marketplace facilitator facilitates or makes sales through the marketplace that, when the sales are combined, meet the threshold amount in section 57-40.2-02.3. A marketplace facilitator exceeding the sales threshold shall obtain a permit under section 57-39.2-14, and begin collecting the tax on sales during the following calendar year or beginning sixty days after the threshold is met, whichever is earlier.

A marketplace facilitator shall be considered the retailer of each sale the facilitator facilitates on its forum for a marketplace seller. Each marketplace facilitator shall:

Be required to collect and remit for each sale any tax imposed under chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2.

Be responsible for all obligations imposed under chapter 57-40.2 as if the marketplace facilitator was the retailer of the sale.

In accordance with the provisions of section 57-40.2-09, keep such records and information as may be required by the tax commissioner to ensure proper collection and remittance of tax.

Certify to its marketplace sellers that it will collect and remit state and local sales and use tax on sales of tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-40.2-02.1 made through the marketplace. A marketplace seller that accepts a marketplace facilitator’s collection certificate in good faith may exclude sales made through the marketplace from the marketplace seller’s return of gross receipts under section 57-39.2-11.

Be subject to audit by the tax commissioner with respect to all retail sales for which it is required to collect and pay the tax imposed under chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2. Where the tax commissioner audits the marketplace facilitator, the tax commissioner is prohibited from auditing the marketplace seller for the same retail sales unless the marketplace facilitator seeks relief under subsection 4.

A marketplace facilitator is not liable under this section for failure to collect and remit sales and use tax if the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that:

The marketplace facilitator has a system in place to require the seller to provide accurate information and has made a reasonable effort to obtain accurate information from the seller about a retail transaction;

The failure to collect and remit the correct tax was due to reliance upon incorrect or insufficient information provided to the marketplace facilitator by the seller. If the marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under this subsection, the seller and the purchaser are liable for any amount of uncollected, unpaid, or unremitted tax; and

The marketplace facilitator and marketplace seller are not affiliated. A marketplace facilitator and a marketplace seller are affiliated if:

Either owns more than five percent of the other; or

Both are subject to the control of a common entity that owns more than five percent of each.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the tax imposed under this section may be refunded under the following conditions:

An entity qualifying for an exemption under subsection 5, 6, 24, 32, 43, 48, or 52 of section 57-39.2-04 may apply in writing to the tax commissioner on a form and in the manner as the tax commissioner may prescribe reciting sufficient facts establishing the exempt status of the sale.

The refund is five dollars or more. Qualifying sales may be accumulated for periods not in excess of one calendar year in order to reach the five dollar limit.

A class action may not be brought against a marketplace facilitator on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected by the marketplace facilitator, regardless of whether such action is characterized as a tax refund claim.

No marketplace facilitator is required to collect or remit sales or use tax under this section on any sale made before October 1, 2019.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 496, § 4, eff for taxable events occurring after July 1, 2019.

57-40.2-03.
Separate and additional use tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-40.2-03.1.
Separate and additional use tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-40.2-03.2.
Use tax on tobacco products.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the use taxes imposed by this chapter apply to the storage, use, or consumption in this state of cigarettes, cigars, and other tobacco products, provided that gross receipts from the sale thereof mean and include any other taxes imposed on such merchandise or its use or on the retail or other sale thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 15; 1973, ch. 465, § 5; 1983, ch. 646, § 2; 1987, ch. 716, § 1; 1989, ch. 714, § 6; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 16.

57-40.2-03.3.
Use tax on contractors.

When a contractor or subcontractor uses tangible personal property in the performance of that person’s contract, or to fulfill contract or subcontract obligations, whether the title to the property be in the contractor, subcontractor, contractee, subcontractee, or any other person, or whether the titleholder of the property would be subject to pay the sales or use tax, the contractor or subcontractor shall pay a use tax at the rate prescribed by section 57-40.2-02.1 measured by the purchase price or fair market value of such property, whichever is greater, unless the property has been previously subjected to a sales tax or use tax by this state, and the tax due has been paid. This section does not apply to a contractor or subcontractor that does not enter a contract for the purchase of the tangible personal property.

The provisions of this chapter pertaining to the administration of the tax imposed by section 57-40.2-02.1, not in conflict with the provisions of this section, govern the administration of the tax levied by this section.

The tax imposed by this section does not apply to:

Production equipment or tangible personal property as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.2;

Machinery, equipment, or other tangible personal property used to construct an agricultural commodity processing facility as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.3 or 57-39.2-04.4;

Tangible personal property used to construct or expand a system used to compress, process, gather, or refine gas recovered from an oil or gas well in this state or used to expand or build a gas-processing facility in this state as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.5;

Tangible personal property used to construct or expand a qualifying oil refinery as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.6;

Tangible personal property used to construct or expand a qualifying facility as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.10;

Tangible personal property used to construct or expand a qualifying facility as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.11;

Materials used in compressing, gathering, collecting, storing, transporting, or injecting carbon dioxide for use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas as provided in section 57-39.2-04.14; or

Tangible personal property used to construct a qualifying fertilizer or chemical processing facility as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.15.

Tangible personal property used to construct a qualified straddle plant, a qualified fractionator, or qualified associated infrastructure as authorized or approved for exemption by the tax commissioner under section 57-39.2-04.16.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 651, § 1; 1985, ch. 642, § 1; 2007, ch. 516, § 4; 2011, ch. 469, § 3; 2013, ch. 459, § 3; 2013, ch. 461, § 2; 2013, ch. 457, § 3; 2015, ch. 457, § 3, effective January 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 458, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 498, § 4, eff for taxable periods beginning after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 477, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

Act is effective for contracts entered after June 30, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 477, S.L. 2021, provides, “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

This Act is effective for contracts entered after June 30, 2021.”

57-40.2-03.4.
Reduced rate for manufacturing machinery and equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 680, § 2.

Cross-References.

Sales tax exemption for manufacturing machinery and equipment, § 57-39.2-04.3.

57-40.2-04.
Exemptions.

This chapter hereby is declared to be an independent and separate tax law but complementary to the retail sales tax laws of this state provided for by chapter 57-39.2 and does not apply to:

Any tangible personal property or taxable service upon the sale of which the retail sales tax imposed by chapter 57-39.2 has been collected by a retailer holding the permit prescribed by section 57-39.2-14.

Tangible personal property brought into this state by a nonresident thereof for that person’s own storage, use, or consumption while temporarily within this state, except that such property is not exempt if brought into this state for storage, use, or consumption in the conduct of a trade, occupation, business, or profession.

Any motor vehicle either subject to or expressly exempted from the motor vehicle excise taxes imposed by chapter 57-40.3.

Tangible personal property upon which the state now imposes and collects a special tax, whether in the form of license tax, stamp tax, or otherwise.

Railway cars and locomotives used in interstate commerce, and tangible personal property which becomes a component part thereof.

Newsprint and ink actually used in the publication of a newspaper.

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 582, § 3.

Gross receipts from the leasing or renting of motion picture film to motion picture exhibitors for exhibition in this state if the sale of the tickets or admissions to the exhibition of the film is subject to the sales tax imposed by chapter 57-39.2.

Adjuvants, agrichemical tank cleaners and foam markers, commercial fertilizers, fungicides, seed treatments, inoculants and fumigants, herbicides and insecticides used by agricultural or commercial vegetable producers and commercial applicators; chemicals used to preserve agricultural crops being stored; and seeds, roots, bulbs, and small plants used by commercial users or consumers for planting or transplanting for commercial vegetable gardens or agricultural purposes.

Gross receipts from the leasing, or renting, for residential housing, for periods of more than thirty consecutive days, of manufactured homes, modular living units, or sectional homes, whether or not placed on a permanent foundation.

Bibles, hymnals, textbooks, and prayerbooks used by nonprofit religious organizations.

Gross receipts from sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical equipment, or mobility-enhancing equipment. For purposes of this subsection:

“Durable medical equipment” means equipment, not including mobility-enhancing equipment, for home use, including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, which:

Can withstand repeated use;

Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury; and

Is not worn in or on the body.

“Mobility-enhancing equipment” means equipment not including durable medical equipment sold under a doctor’s written prescription, including repair and replacement parts for mobility-enhancing equipment, which:

Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one place to another and which is appropriate for use either at home or in a motor vehicle;

Is not generally used by a person with normal mobility; and

Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.

“Prosthetic device” means a replacement, corrective, or supportive device sold under a doctor’s written prescription, including repair and replacement parts for such a device, worn on or in the body to:

Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;

Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or

Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.

“Supplies for ostomy care or bladder dysfunction” includes:

Supplies designed or intended for ostomy care and management, including collection devices, colostomy irrigation equipment and supplies, skin barriers or skin protectors, and other supplies especially designed for use of ostomates.

Supplies to be used exclusively by a person with bladder dysfunction, including catheters, collection devices, incontinence pads and pants, adult diapers, and other items used for the care and management of bladder dysfunction. For the purposes of this paragraph:

“Adult diapers” means diapers other than children’s diapers.

“Children’s diapers” means diapers marketed to be worn by children.

“Diaper” means an absorbent garment worn by humans who are incapable of, or have difficulty, controlling their bladder or bowel movements.

Purchases of electricity.

The leasing or renting of any tangible personal property upon which a North Dakota sales tax or use tax has been paid under the election of the purchaser under subsection 21 of section 57-39.2-01 or subsection 5 of section 57-40.2-01 and the retailer has separately indicated on an invoice, contract, lease agreement, or other supporting sale document that the retailer paid sales or use tax on the retailer’s purchase of the tangible personal property.

Any tangible personal property or service which would be exempt from the retail sales tax pursuant to an express exemption provided in chapter 57-39.2 if it were purchased in North Dakota.

Gross receipts from the sale of money, including all legal tender coins and currency.

Gross receipts from sales to nonprofit voluntary health associations which are exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)]. As used in this subsection, a voluntary health association is an organization recognized by the internal revenue service, the national health council, the state tax commissioner, and the North Dakota secretary of state as a nonprofit organization that is exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and meets the following requirements: It has been organized and operated exclusively in providing services for the purposes of preventing and alleviating human illness and injury. Methods used to obtain these goals would include education, research, community service, and direct patient services, income being derived solely from private donations with some exceptions of a minimal membership fee. Its members are not limited to only individuals who themselves are licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as the organization. The disbursement of funds within a volunteer health association is to be controlled by a board of directors who work voluntarily and without pay.

Gross receipts from the sale of a manufactured home that has been sold, bargained, exchanged, given away, or transferred by the person who first acquired it from a retailer in a sale at retail and upon which the North Dakota use tax has previously been imposed.

The donation by a retailer of tangible personal property to an organization exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)].

Air carrier transportation property subject to ad valorem property taxation pursuant to the provisions of chapters 57-06, 57-07, 57-08, 57-13, and 57-32.

Tangible personal property consisting of flight simulators or mechanical or electronic equipment for use in association with a flight simulator.

Gross receipts from the initial sale of beneficiated coal.

Gross receipts from electronic games of chance licensed by the attorney general under chapter 53-06.1.

Gross receipts from sales of carbon dioxide used for enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas or secure geologic storage.

Gross receipts from the sale of items delivered electronically, including specified digital products. For purposes of this subsection:

“Specified digital products” means:

“Digital audio-visual works” which means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any;

“Digital audio works” which means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones; and

“Digital books” which means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.

For purposes of the definition of “specified digital products”, “transferred electronically” means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.

For purposes of the definition of “digital audio works”, “ringtones” means digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a device and which may be used to alert the customer with respect to a communication.

“Specified digital products” may not be construed to include prewritten computer software as that term is defined in subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 57-39.2-02.1.

Provides services through the aging services division of the department of human services; or

Receives grant funds through the department of transportation under the federal transit administration’s enhanced mobility of seniors and individuals with disabilities program [49 U.S.C. 5310].

“Durable medical equipment” includes equipment and devices designed or intended for ostomy care and management and equipment and devices used exclusively for a person with bladder dysfunction. An exemption certificate is not required to obtain exemption. Repair and replacement parts as used in this definition include all components or attachments used in conjunction with the durable medical equipment. Repair and replacement parts do not include items which are for single patient use only.

“Mobility-enhancing equipment” includes crutches and wheelchairs for the use of disabled persons, equipment, including manual control units, van lifts, van door opening units, and raised roofs for attaching to or modifying a motor vehicle for use by a permanently physically disabled person, equipment, including elevators, dumbwaiters, chair lifts, and bedroom or bathroom lifts, whether or not sold for attaching to real property, for use by a permanently physically disabled person in that person’s principal dwelling, and equipment, including manual control units, for attaching to or modifying motorized implements of husbandry for use by a permanently physically disabled person.

“Prosthetic device” includes artificial devices individually designed, constructed, or altered solely for the use of a particular disabled person so as to become a brace, support, supplement, correction, or substitute for the bodily structure, including the extremities of the individual, artificial limbs, artificial eyes, hearing aids, and other equipment worn as a correction or substitute for any functioning portion of the body, artificial teeth sold by a dentist, and eyeglasses when especially designed or prescribed by an ophthalmologist, physician, oculist, or optometrist for the personal use of the owner or purchaser.

(Contingent effective date — See note)

26.

Gross receipts from sales of liquefied natural gas used for agricultural, industrial, or railroad purposes as defined in section 57-43.2-01.

(Effective through August 31, 2022)

27.

Gross receipts from sales to a senior citizen organization that provides informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens in this state if the senior citizen organization:

a.

Is recognized by the internal revenue service as having exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3);

b.

Is recognized by the secretary of state as a charitable organization; and

c.

Either:

(Effective September 1, 2022) Gross receipts from sales to a senior citizen organization that provides informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens in this state if the senior citizen organization:

a.

Is recognized by the internal revenue service as having exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3);

b.

Is recognized by the secretary of state as a charitable organization; and

c.

Either:

(1)

Provides services through the aging services division of the department of health and human services; or

(2)

Receives grant funds through the department of transportation under the federal transit administration’s enhanced mobility of seniors and individuals with disabilities program [49 U.S.C. 5310].

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 29; 1967, ch. 460, § 5; 1969, ch. 520, § 2; 1969, ch. 522, § 2; 1969, ch. 523, § 2; 1971, ch. 571, § 2; 1975, ch. 550, § 2; 1975, ch. 551, § 2; 1977, ch. 544, § 4; 1977, ch. 549, §§ 1, 2; I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 5; 1979, ch. 618, § 2; 1981, ch. 582, § 3; 1981, ch. 598, § 7; 1981, ch. 601, § 5; 1981, ch. 603, § 2; 1981, ch. 604, § 2; 1983, ch. 592, § 7; 1983, ch. 652, § 1; 1987, ch. 670, § 3; 1987, ch. 710, § 2; 1989, ch. 170, § 9; 1989, ch. 718, § 3; 1989, ch. 719, § 2; 2003, ch. 539, § 24; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 574, § 4; 2005, ch. 580, § 17; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 528, § 22; 2009, ch. 556, § 21; 2009, ch. 563, § 2; 2011, ch. 467, § 5; 2013, ch. 459, § 4; 2013, ch. 458, § 5; 2015, ch. 452, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 477, § 15, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 471, § 2 eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021; 2021, ch. 472, § 2 eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021.

Note.

Section 57-40.2-04 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 471, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2152; and Section 2 of Chapter 472, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1351.

Section 6 of chapter 459, S.L. 2013 provides: “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 2 and 3 of this Act are effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2013. Sections 1, 4, and 5 of this Act are effective upon receipt of certification by the tax commissioner from the plant owner that construction of the gas liquefaction plant eligible for the exemptions under sections 2 and 3 of this Act is complete.”